Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-215
Public library; donations; library board may accept.

Any person may make donation of money, lands or other property for the benefit of any public library. The title to property so donated may be made to and shall vest in the library board of such library and their successors in office, and the board shall thereby become the owners thereof in trust to the uses of the public library of the city, village, township or county.

Laws 1911, c. 73, § 10, p. 317;

R.S.1913, § 3801;

C.S.1922, § 3194;

C.S.1929, § 51-210;

Laws 1937, c. 123, § 1, p. 434;

Laws 1941, c. 103, § 2, p. 422;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-210;

R.S.1943, § 51-215.